Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-4,150
Commercial driver's license; CLP-commercial learner's permit; replacement; application; delivery.

(1) Any person holding a commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit who loses his or her license or permit, who requires issuance of a replacement license or permit because of a change of name or address, or whose license or permit is mutilated or unreadable may obtain a replacement commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit by filing an application pursuant to this section and by furnishing proof of identification in accordance with section 60-4,144. Any person seeking a replacement license or permit for such reasons, except because of a change of name, may also obtain a replacement license or permit by submitting an electronic application pursuant to section 60-4,148.01.

(2) An application for a replacement license or permit because of a change of name or address shall be made within sixty days after the change of name or address.

(3) A replacement commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit issued pursuant to this section shall be delivered to the applicant as provided in section 60-4,113 after department personnel or the county treasurer collects the fees prescribed in section 60-4,115 and issues the applicant a receipt with driving privileges which is valid for up to thirty days. Replacement commercial drivers' licenses or CLP-commercial learners' permits issued pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner provided for the issuance of original and renewal commercial drivers' licenses or the issuance of permits as provided for by section 60-4,149.

(4) Upon issuance of any replacement commercial driver's license or permit, the commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit for which the replacement license or permit is issued shall be void. Each replacement commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit shall be issued with the same expiration date as the license or permit for which the replacement is issued. The replacement license or permit shall also state the new issuance date.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 100;

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 126, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 25;

Laws 2005, LB 1, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 24;

Laws 2010, LB805, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB215, § 21;

Laws 2014, LB777, § 10;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 38;

Laws 2016, LB311, § 20;

Laws 2016, LB977, § 19;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 46;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 37.